Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.540

Extracurricular activities—Data collection, publishing, and reporting.

(1) Beginning April 1, 2021, and by April 1st annually thereafter, school districts must collect and report to the associated student body executive board the data related to students in possession of associated student body cards and student participation in school-based athletic programs described in subsection (3) of this section. An associated student body executive board must be provided with data from its high school only, and not with data from other high schools in the district. This data must include at least two weeks of data from the beginning of spring athletics season.

(2) Beginning April 15, 2021, and by April 15th annually thereafter, school districts must collect the data related to student possession of an associated student body card and student participation in school-based athletic programs described in subsection (3) of this section and publish the data as required under RCW 28A.325.050.

(3) Student possession of an associated student body card and student participation in school-based athletic programs data must include:

(a) The total number of high school students and the total number of high school students who are low income;

(b) The purchase amount of an associated student body card for high school students;

(c) The discounted purchase amount of an associated student body card for high school students who are low income;

(d) Athletic program participation fees and any discounted fees for high school students who are low income;

(e) The number of high school students who possess an associated student body card and the number of high school students who are both low income and possess an associated student body card;

(f) The number of high school students participating in an athletic program and the number of high school students who are both low income and participate in an athletic program;

(g) The opportunity gap in student possession of an associated student body card, as calculated under RCW 28A.320.550;

(h) The opportunity gap in athletic program participation, as calculated under RCW 28A.320.550;

(i) Whether the school district has met the opportunity gap goals described in RCW 28A.320.560 and 28A.320.570; and

(j) The extracurricular activity opportunity gap reduction plan, as described in RCW 28A.320.580, as applicable.

(4) Data collected, reported, and published as required under this section must be from the current school year.

(5) Although data on student participation in school clubs is not required under this section, high schools may include it at their discretion.

(6) School districts that do not enroll high school students are exempt from this section.

(7) Upon request from the superintendent of public instruction, school districts must provide a summary report of the data in this section.

(8) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to implement this section.

[ 2020 c 13 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 13: See note following RCW 28A.320.580.